Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-132
Gifts and bequests; acceptance.

The Board of Regents may accept gifts and bequests of property subject to a reservation of the income for a stated period or for the life of the donor or the life or lives of other persons designated.

Laws 1911, c. 136, § 1, p. 448;

R.S.1913, § 7110;

C.S.1922, § 6742;

Laws 1923, c. 66, § 1, p. 198;

Laws 1927, c. 79, § 1, p. 244;

C.S.1929, § 85-128;

R.S.1943, § 85-132;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 7.